Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 3

Operation and Powers [Repealed]

7-83-301. [Repealed.]

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 8; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.54 (Williams, § 3708.57); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2709; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 211, § 6, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 7, ch. 83, part 3, §§7-83-301 —7-83-311, concerned operation and powers of a power district.

7-83-302. [Repealed.]

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 8; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.54 (Williams, § 3708.57); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2710; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 211, § 6, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 7, ch. 83, part 3, §§7-83-301 —7-83-311, concerned operation and powers.

7-83-303. [Repealed.]

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.54 (Williams, § 3708.57); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2711; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 211, § 6, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 7, ch. 83, part 3, §§7-83-301 —7-83-311, concerned operation and powers of a power district.

7-83-304. [Repealed.]

C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.54; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2712; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 211, § 6, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 7, ch. 83, part 3, §§7-83-301 —7-83-311, concerned operation and powers of a power district.

7-83-305. [Repealed.]

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 18; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.64 (Williams, § 3708.67); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2713; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 211, § 6, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 7, ch. 83, part 3, §§7-83-301 —7-83-311, concerned operation and powers of a power district.

7-83-306. [Repealed.]

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 14; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.60 (Williams, § 3708.63); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2714; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 211, § 6, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 7, ch. 83, part 3, §§7-83-301 —7-83-311, concerned operation and powers of a power district.

7-83-307. [Repealed.]

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 13; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.59 (Williams, § 3708.62); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2715; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 211, § 6, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 7, ch. 83, part 3, §§7-83-301 —7-83-311, concerned operation and powers of a power district.

7-83-308. [Repealed.]

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 15; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.61 (Williams, § 3708.64); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2720; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 211, § 6, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 7, ch. 83, part 3, §§7-83-301 —7-83-311, concerned operation and powers of a power district.

7-83-309. [Repealed.]

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 16; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.62 (Williams, § 3708.65); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2721; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 211, § 6, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 7, ch. 83, part 3, §§7-83-301 —7-83-311, concerned operation and powers of a power district.

7-83-310. [Repealed.]

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 11; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.57 (Williams, § 3708.60); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2722; Acts 1980, ch. 601, § 6; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 211, § 6, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 7, ch. 83, part 3, §§7-83-301 —7-83-311, concerned operation and powers of a power district.

7-83-311. [Repealed.]

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 12; C. Supp. 1950, § 3708.58 (Williams, § 3708.61); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2723; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 211, § 6, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 7, ch. 83, part 3, §§7-83-301 —7-83-311, concerned operation and powers of a power district.